District of Columbia statutes.
29A-241.04

Repealed

Officers — Election; failure to hold.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1301, ch. 854, § 705
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(4), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-304.
1981 Ed., § 29-704.
2001 Ed., § 29-241.04.